Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20269-431
Lottery or raffle ticket or stub; requirements.

Each licensed organization conducting a lottery or raffle conducted pursuant to the Nebraska Lottery and Raffle Act shall have its name and identification number clearly printed on each lottery or raffle ticket or stub used in such lottery or raffle. No such ticket or stub shall be sold unless such name and identification number is so printed thereon. In addition, all lottery or raffle tickets or stubs shall bear a number, which numbers shall be in sequence and clearly printed on the ticket or stub.

Except as provided for a lottery or raffle conducted pursuant to section 9-426.02, each ticket or stub shall have an equal chance of being chosen in the drawing. Each ticket or stub shall be constructed of the same material, shall have the same surface, and shall be substantially the same shape, size, form and weight.

Each licensed organization conducting a lottery or raffle shall keep a record of all locations where its tickets or stubs are sold. In addition to other authorized sales, a licensed organization conducting a raffle conducted pursuant to the Nebraska Lottery and Raffle Act may also sell tickets or stubs for such raffles on its website and at events, and such tickets or stubs may be purchased using a debit card online on the website and at events in addition to other authorized methods of payment.

Laws 1984, LB 949, § 62;

R.S.Supp.,1984, § 9-198;

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 152;

Laws 2020, LB1056, § 3;

Laws 2026, LB1001, § 25.
July 1, 2026